Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
For case note, “Criminal Procedure — Witness Immunity — The Story
of a County Attorney Who Said, 'I Think I Can, I Think I Can,'
and
the Brave Little Conscience that Couldn't be
Shocked. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1992).

For case note, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional
Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions?
Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

For case note, “State Constitutional Law — Wyoming's Interpretation of Its Right to Silence. Tortolito v. State, 901 P.2d 387,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1995) (replacing Tortolito v. State, 885 P.2d 864,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1994) (withdrawn)),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 217 (1996).

Article, A Comprehensive Treatise on Contempt of Court in Wyoming, 15 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in state probation revocation proceedings, of incriminating statement obtained in violation of Miranda rule, 77 ALR3d 669.

Former jeopardy: propriety of trial court's declaration of mistrial or discharge of jury, without accused's consent, on ground of prosecution's disclosure of prejudicial matter to, or making prejudicial remarks in presence of, jury, 77 ALR3d 1143.

Acquittal of criminal charges other than contempt as precluding contempt proceedings relating to same transaction, 88 ALR3d 1089.

Instruction allowing presumption or inference of guilt from possession of recently stolen property as violation of defendant's privilege against self-incrimination, 88 ALR3d 1178.

Admissibility in evidence of confession made by accused in anticipation of, during, or following polygraph examination, 89 ALR3d 230.

Admissibility of polygraph evidence at trial on issue of voluntariness of confession made by accused, 92 ALR3d 1317.

Double jeopardy as bar to retrial after grant of defendant's motion for mistrial, 98 ALR3d 997.

Applicability of double jeopardy to juvenile court proceedings, 5 ALR4th 234.

Propriety of using otherwise inadmissible statement, taken in violation of Miranda rule, to impeach criminal defendant's credibility — state cases, 14 ALR4th 676.

Admissibility in criminal case of blood-alcohol test where blood was taken despite defendant's objection or refusal to submit to test, 14 ALR4th 690.

Retrial on greater offense following reversal of plea-based conviction of lesser offense, 14 ALR4th 970.

What constitutes “manifest necessity” for state prosecutor's dismissal of action, allowing subsequent trial despite jeopardy's having attached, 14 ALR4th 1014.

Right of partners to assert personal privilege against self-incrimination with respect to production of partnership books or records, 17 ALR4th 1039.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecution's calling as witness, to extract claim of self-incrimination privilege, one involved in offense charged against accused, 19 ALR4th 368.

Impeachment of defense witness in criminal case by showing witness' prior silence or failure or refusal to testify, 20 ALR4th 245.

Necessity and sufficiency of statements informing one under investigation for involuntary commitment of right to remain silent, 23 ALR4th 563.

Right of prosecution to discovery of case-related notes, statements, and reports — state cases, 23 ALR4th 799.

Propriety of increased sentence following revocation of probation, 23 ALR4th 883.

Propriety of requiring suspect or accused to alter, or to refrain from altering, physical or bodily appearance, 24 ALR4th 592.

Sufficiency of showing that voluntariness of confession or admission was affected by alcohol or other drugs, 25 ALR4th 419.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument commenting on failure of defendant's spouse to testify, 26 ALR4th 9.

Power of state court, during same term, to increase severity of lawful sentence — modern status, 26 ALR4th 905.

Contempt finding as precluding substantive criminal charges relating to same transaction, 26 ALR4th 950.

Admissibility in criminal case of evidence that accused refused to take test of intoxication, 26 ALR4th 1112.

Extent and determination of attorney's right or privilege against self-incrimination in disbarment or other disciplinary proceedings — post-Spevack cases, 30 ALR4th 243.

Failure to object to improper questions or comments as to defendant's pretrial silence or failure to testify as constituting waiver of right to complain of error — modern cases, 32 ALR4th 774.

Impeachment of defendant in criminal case by showing defendant's prearrest silence — state cases, 35 ALR4th 731.

Propriety of using single prior felony conviction as basis for offense of possessing weapon by convicted felon and to enhance sentence, 37 ALR4th 1168.

Former jeopardy as bar to retrial of criminal defendant after original trial court's sua sponte declaration of a mistrial — state cases, 40 ALR4th 741.

Admissibility of police officer's testimony at state trial relating to motorist's admissions made in or for automobile accident report required by law, 46 ALR4th 291.

Voluntariness of confession as affected by police statements that suspect's relatives will benefit by the confession, 51 ALR4th 495.

Double jeopardy: various acts of weapons violations as separate or continuing offense, 80 ALR4th 631.

What constitutes assertion of right to counsel following Miranda warnings — state cases, 83 ALR4th 443.

Determination that state failed to prove charges relied upon for revocation of probation as barring subsequent criminal action based on same underlying charges, 2 ALR5th 262.

Requirement under property insurance policy that insured submit to examination under oath as to loss, 16 ALR5th 412.

Propriety, under state constitutional provisions, of granting use or transactional immunity for compelling incriminating testimony — post-Kastigar cases, 29 ALR5th 1.

Sufficiency of corroboration of confession for purpose of establishing corpus delicti as question of law or fact, 33 ALR5th 571.

Coercive conduct by private person as affecting admissibility of confession under state statutes or constitutional provisions — post-Connelly cases, 48 ALR5th 555.

Propriety of probation condition exposing defendant to public shame or ridicule, 65 ALR5th 187.

Sufficiency of showing that voluntariness of confession or admission was affected by alcohol or other drugs — Drugs or narcotics administered as part of medical treatment and drugs or intoxicants administered by the police, 96 ALR5th 523.

Conviction or acquittal in federal court as bar to prosecution in state court for state offense based on same facts — Modern view, 97 ALR5th 201.

Failure to appeal denial of double jeopardy claim within time limits of Rule 4, Federal Rules of Appellate Procedure, as precluding review of claim on appeal of conviction at retrial, 51 ALR Fed 770.

Effect on federal criminal prosecution or conviction of prosecutor's noncompliance with petite policy requiring prior authorization of attorney general for federal trial where accused has been previously prosecuted for same acts in state court, 51 ALR Fed 852.

Propriety of court's failure or refusal to strike direct testimony of government witness who refuses, on grounds of self-incrimination, to answer questions on cross-examination, 55 ALR Fed 742.

Right of immune jury witness to obtain access to government affidavits and other supporting materials in order to challenge legality of court-ordered wiretap or electronic surveillance which provided basis for questions asked in grand jury proceedings, 60 ALR Fed 706.

Propriety of search involving removal of natural substance or foreign object from body by actual or threatened force, 66 ALR Fed 119.

Propriety of use of multiple juries at joint trial of multiple defendants in federal criminal case, 72 ALR Fed 875.

Necessity that Miranda warnings include express reference to right to have attorney present during interrogation, 77 ALR Fed 123.

Availability of sole shareholder's fifth amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation's books and records — modern status, 87 ALR Fed 177.

Construction and application of provision of Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, that defendant's confession shall not be inadmissible in evidence in federal criminal prosecution solely because of delay in presentment before magistrate, 124 ALR Fed 263.

Admissibility in federal criminal case of results of polygraph (lie detector) test — Post-Daubert Cases, 140 ALR Fed 525.

What circumstances fall within public safety exception to general requirement, pursuant to or as aid in enforcement of federal constitution's Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination, to give Miranda warnings before conducting custodial interrogation — post-Quarles cases, 142 ALR Fed 229.

Double jeopardy considerations in federal criminal cases — Supreme Court cases, 162 ALR Fed 415.

What constitutes “custodial interrogation” of juvenile by police officer within rule of

Miranda v. Arizona

requiring that suspect be informed of federal constitutional rights before custodial interrogation - at police station or sheriff's office. 26 A.L.R.6th 451.

What constitutes “custodial interrogation” at hospital by police officer within rule of

Miranda v. Arizona

requiring that suspect be informed of his or her federal constitutional rights before custodial interrogation - suspect injured or taken ill. 25 A.L.R.6th 379.

Voluntary nature of confession as affected by appeal to religious beliefs. 20 A.L.R.6th 479.